Florida, session 2026, SB1284.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 47 48 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 901.02, Florida 49 Statutes, is amended to read: 50 901.02âIssuance of arrest warrants.â 51 (2)âIf a complaint alleges only the commission of a 52 misdemeanor offense, a judge may either The court may issue a 53 warrant for the defendantâs arrest when all of the following 54 circumstances apply: 55 (a)âIssue an arrest warrant in accordance with subsection 56 (1); or A complaint has been filed charging the commission of a 57 misdemeanor only. 58 (b)âIssue a summons pursuant s. 901.09(2) or a notice to 59 appear in lieu of an arrest warrant if she or he reasonably 60 believes that the person against whom the complaint was made 61 will appear upon the summons or notice to appear and does not 62 believe that special conditions of pretrial release are 63 necessary to protect a victim or the community The summons 64 issued to the defendant has been returned unserved. 65 (c)âThe conditions of subsection (1) are met. 66 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 901.09, Florida 67 Statutes, is amended to read: 68 901.09âWhen summons shall be issued.â 69 (2)âWhen the complaint is for a misdemeanor that the trial 70 court judge is not empowered to try summarily, the trial court 71 judge may shall issue a summons instead of a warrant if she or 72 he reasonably believes that the person against whom the 73 complaint was made will appear upon a summons and does not 74 believe that special conditions of pretrial release are 75 necessary to protect a victim or the community. 76 Section 3.âSubsections (6) and (9) of section 901.15, 77 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 78 901.15âWhen arrest by officer without warrant is lawful.âA 79 law enforcement officer may arrest a person without a warrant 80 when: 81 (6)âThere is probable cause to believe that the person has 82 committed a criminal act according to s. 790.233 or according to 83 s. 741.31, s. 784.047, s. 784.0487, or s. 825.1036 which 84 violates an injunction for protection entered pursuant to s. 85 741.30, s. 784.046, s. 784.0485, or s. 825.1035 or a foreign 86 protection order accorded full faith and credit pursuant to s. 87 741.315, over the objection of the petitioner, if necessary. 88 (9)âThere is probable cause to believe that the person has 89 committed any of the following: 90 (a)âAny battery upon another person, as defined in s. 91 784.03. 92 (b)âAn act of criminal mischief or a graffiti-related 93 offense as described in s. 806.13. 94 (c)âA violation of a safety zone, security zone, regulated 95 navigation area, or naval vessel protection zone as described in 96 s. 327.461. 97 (d)âA racing, street takeover, or stunt driving violation 98 as described in s. 316.191(2). 99 (e)âAn exposure of sexual organs in violation of s. 800.03. 100 (f)âPossession of a firearm by a minor in violation of s. 101 790.22(3). 102 (g)âTrespass upon school grounds or facilities, including 103 school buses as defined in s. 810.097(5)(b), in violation of 104 that section. 105 (h)âAn act that constitutes driving under the influence in 106 violation of s. 316.193. 107 (i)âAn act that constitutes boating under the influence in 108 violation of s. 327.35. 109 Section 4.âSection 933.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to 110 read: 111 933.02âGrounds for issuance of search warrant.âUpon proper 112 affidavits being made, a search warrant may be issued under the 113 provisions of this chapter upon any of the following grounds: 114 (1)âWhen the property has shall have been stolen or 115 embezzled in violation of law.; 116 (2)âWhen any property has shall have been used: 117 (a)âAs a means to commit any crime; 118 (b)âIn connection with gambling, gambling implements and 119 appliances; or 120 (c)âIn violation of s. 847.011 or other laws in reference 121 to obscene prints and literature.; 122 (3)âWhen any property constitutes evidence relevant to 123 proving that a felony has been committed.; 124 (4)âWhen any property is being held or possessed in 125 violation of: 126 (a)âIn violation of Any of the laws prohibiting the 127 manufacture, sale, and transportation of intoxicating liquors; 128 (b)âIn violation of The fish and game laws; 129 (c)âIn violation of The laws relative to food and drug; or 130 (d)âIn violation of The laws relative to citrus disease 131 pursuant to s. 581.184.; or 132 (5)âWhen the laws in relation to cruelty to animals, as 133 provided in chapter 828, have been or are violated in any 134 particular building or place. 135 (6)âWhen a sample of the blood of a person or other 136 property constitutes evidence relevant to proving that a 137 violation of s. 316.193 or s. 327.35 has been committed. 138 (7)âWhen the laws in relation to domestic violence as 139 defined in s. 741.28 are violated in any particular building or 140 place. 141 (8)âWhen the laws in relation to any misdemeanor crime that 142 involves the use or threat of physical force or violence against 143 an individual are violated. 144 145 This section also applies to any papers or documents used as a 146 means of or in aid of the commission of any offense against the 147 laws of the state. 148 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendments 149 made by this act to sections 901.02 and 901.15, Florida 150 Statutes, in references thereto, subsections (2) and (3) of 151 section 901.1501, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 152 901.1501âImmediate arrest of a person with a significant 153 medical condition.â 154 (2)âIn determining whether to make an immediate arrest of a 155 person with a significant medical condition, including an arrest 156 for an offense committed against an elderly person or a disabled 157 adult, a law enforcement officer may use his or her discretion 158 based on the totality of the circumstances, including 159 consideration of whether the person is a current or continued 160 threat to public safety or himself or herself or a flight risk, 161 and may consider all available lawful methods of making an 162 arrest, including seeking an arrest warrant under s. 901.02. 163 (3)âThis section does not prohibit a law enforcement 164 officer from arresting a person without a warrant under s. 165 901.15, or making such an arrest by any lawful method. 166 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 167 made by this act to section 901.15, Florida Statutes, in a 168 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (9) of section 169 20.165, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 170 20.165âDepartment of Business and Professional Regulation. 171 There is created a Department of Business and Professional 172 Regulation. 173 (9) 174 (b)âEach employee serving as a law enforcement officer for 175 the division must meet the qualifications for employment or 176 appointment as a law enforcement officer set forth under s. 177 943.13 and must be certified as a law enforcement officer by the 178 Department of Law Enforcement under chapter 943. Upon 179 certification, each law enforcement officer is subject to and 180 has the same authority as provided for law enforcement officers 181 generally in chapter 901 and has statewide jurisdiction. Each 182 officer also has arrest authority as provided for state law 183 enforcement officers in s. 901.15. Each officer possesses the 184 full law enforcement powers granted to other peace officers of 185 this state, including the authority to make arrests, carry 186 firearms, serve court process, and seize contraband and the 187 proceeds of illegal activities. 188 1.âThe primary responsibility of each officer appointed 189 under this section is to investigate, enforce, and prosecute, 190 throughout the state, violations and violators of parts I and II 191 of chapter 210, part VII of chapter 559, and chapters 561-569, 192 and the rules adopted thereunder, as well as other state laws 193 that the division, all state law enforcement officers, or 194 beverage enforcement agents are specifically authorized to 195 enforce. 196 2.âThe secondary responsibility of each officer appointed 197 under this section is to enforce all other state laws, provided 198 that the enforcement is incidental to exercising the officerâs 199 primary responsibility as provided in subparagraph 1., and the 200 officer exercises the powers of a deputy sheriff, only after 201 consultation or coordination with the appropriate local 202 sheriffâs office or municipal police department or when the 203 division participates in the Florida Mutual Aid Plan during a 204 declared state emergency. 205 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 206 made by this act to section 901.15, Florida Statutes, in a 207 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 39.504, Florida 208 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 209 39.504âInjunction; penalty.â 210 (5)âService of process on the respondent shall be carried 211 out pursuant to s. 741.30. The department shall deliver a copy 212 of any injunction issued pursuant to this section to the 213 protected party or to a parent, caregiver, or individual acting 214 in the place of a parent who is not the respondent. Law 215 enforcement officers may exercise their arrest powers as 216 provided in s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction. 217 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 218 made by this act to section 901.15, Florida Statutes, in a 219 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 321.05, Florida 220 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 221 321.05âDuties, functions, and powers of patrol officers. 222 The members of the Florida Highway Patrol are hereby declared to 223 be conservators of the peace and law enforcement officers of the 224 state, with the common-law right to arrest a person who, in the 225 presence of the arresting officer, commits a felony or commits 226 an affray or breach of the peace constituting a misdemeanor, 227 with full power to bear arms; and they shall apprehend, without 228 warrant, any person in the unlawful commission of any of the 229 acts over which the members of the Florida Highway Patrol are 230 given jurisdiction as hereinafter set out and deliver him or her 231 to the sheriff of the county that further proceedings may be had 232 against him or her according to law. In the performance of any 233 of the powers, duties, and functions authorized by law, members 234 of the Florida Highway Patrol have the same protections and 235 immunities afforded other peace officers, which shall be 236 recognized by all courts having jurisdiction over offenses 237 against the laws of this state, and have authority to apply for, 238 serve, and execute search warrants, arrest warrants, capias, and 239 other process of the court. The patrol officers under the 240 direction and supervision of the Department of Highway Safety 241 and Motor Vehicles shall perform and exercise throughout the 242 state the following duties, functions, and powers: 243 (1)âTo patrol the state highways and regulate, control, and 244 direct the movement of traffic thereon; to maintain the public 245 peace by preventing violence on highways; to apprehend fugitives 246 from justice; to enforce all laws regulating and governing 247 traffic, travel, and public safety upon the public highways and 248 providing for the protection of the public highways and public 249 property thereon, including the security and safety of this 250 stateâs transportation infrastructure; to make arrests without 251 warrant for the violation of any state law committed in their 252 presence in accordance with state law; providing that no search 253 may be made unless it is incident to a lawful arrest, to 254 regulate and direct traffic concentrations and congestions; to 255 enforce laws governing the operation, licensing, and taxing and 256 limiting the size, weight, width, length, and speed of vehicles 257 and licensing and controlling the operations of drivers and 258 operators of vehicles, including the safety, size, and weight of 259 commercial motor vehicles; to collect all state fees and 260 revenues levied as an incident to the use or right to use the 261 highways for any purpose, including the taxing and registration 262 of commercial motor vehicles; to require the drivers of vehicles 263 to stop and exhibit their driver licenses, registration cards, 264 or documents required by law to be carried by such vehicles; to 265 investigate traffic accidents, secure testimony of witnesses and 266 of persons involved, and make report thereof with copy, if 267 requested in writing, to any person in interest or his or her 268 attorney; to investigate reported thefts of vehicles; and to 269 seize contraband or stolen property on or being transported on 270 the highways. Each patrol officer of the Florida Highway Patrol 271 is subject to and has the same arrest and other authority 272 provided for law enforcement officers generally in chapter 901 273 and has statewide jurisdiction. Each officer also has arrest 274 authority as provided for state law enforcement officers in s. 275 901.15. This section does not conflict with, but is supplemental 276 to, chapter 933. 277 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 278 made by this act to section 901.15, Florida Statutes, in a 279 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 570.65, Florida 280 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 281 570.65âDepartment of Agriculture and Consumer Services, law 282 enforcement officers.â 283 (2)âEach law enforcement officer shall meet the 284 qualifications of law enforcement officers under s. 943.13 and 285 shall be certified as a law enforcement officer by the 286 Department of Law Enforcement under the provisions of chapter 287 943. Upon certification, each law enforcement officer is subject 288 to and shall have the same arrest and other authority provided 289 for law enforcement officers generally in chapter 901 and shall 290 have statewide jurisdiction. Each officer shall also have arrest 291 authority as provided for state law enforcement officers in s. 292 901.15. Such officers have full law enforcement powers granted 293 to other peace officers of this state, including the authority 294 to make arrests, carry firearms, serve court process, and seize 295 contraband and the proceeds of illegal activities. 296 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 297 made by this act to section 901.15, Florida Statutes, in a 298 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (6) of section 299 741.30, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 300 741.30âDomestic violence; injunction; powers and duties of 301 court and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary 302 injunction; issuance of injunction; statewide verification 303 system; enforcement; public records exemption.â 304 (6) 305 (d)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 306 protection against domestic violence entered under this section 307 shall, on its face, indicate that: 308 1.âThe injunction is valid and enforceable in all counties 309 of the State of Florida. 310 2.âLaw enforcement officers may use their arrest powers 311 under s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction. 312 3.âThe court had jurisdiction over the parties and matter 313 under the laws of Florida and that reasonable notice and 314 opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom the 315 order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to due 316 process. 317 4.âThe date the respondent was served with the temporary or 318 final order, if obtainable. 319 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 320 made by this act to section 901.15, Florida Statutes, in 321 references thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (6) and 322 paragraph (b) of subsection (9) of section 784.0485, Florida 323 Statutes, are reenacted to read: 324 784.0485âStalking; injunction; powers and duties of court 325 and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary injunction; 326 issuance of injunction; statewide verification system; 327 enforcement.â 328 (6) 329 (c)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 330 protection against stalking entered pursuant to this section 331 shall, on its face, indicate: 332 1.âThat the injunction is valid and enforceable in all 333 counties of this state. 334 2.âThat law enforcement officers may use their arrest 335 powers pursuant to s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the 336 injunction. 337 3.âThat the court has jurisdiction over the parties and 338 matter under the laws of this state and that reasonable notice 339 and opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom 340 the order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to 341 due process. 342 4.âThe date that the respondent was served with the 343 temporary or final order, if obtainable. 344 (9) 345 (b)âIf the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement 346 officer under s. 901.15(6) or for a violation of s. 784.0487, 347 the respondent shall be held in custody until brought before the 348 court as expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing 349 the injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with 350 chapter 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure, 351 pending a hearing. 352 Section 12.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.